Delaware, session 153, SB126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 31, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3128. Voting location. In a primary election, a voter may vote at any polling place for any election district in the county in which the voter is registered to vote. Section 2. Amend Chapter 45, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4517. Voting location. In an election, a voter may vote at any polling place for any election district in the county in which the voter is registered to vote. Section 3. Amend Â§ 302, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 302. General powers and duties of Commissioner. The Commissioner shall have the following powers and duties: (18) To consolidate polling places into centrally located centers for voting, as long each election district retains at least one polling place and the consolidation of polling places does not result in an undue burden on votersâ access to polling places.